Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-568
Directors; petition for determination of power; notice; hearing; order; appeal.

The board may at any time file a petition in the court, praying a judicial examination and determination of (1) any power conferred hereby by any amendment hereto, (2) any tax or assessment levied, or (3) any act, proceeding, or contract of the district, whether or not the contract shall have been executed, including proposed contracts for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of works for the district. Such petition shall set forth the facts on which the validity of such power, assessment, act, proceeding, or contract is founded and shall be verified by the president of the board. Notice of the filing of the petition shall be given by the clerk of the district court, under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any contract or contracts mentioned in the petition may be examined. The notice shall be served by publication in at least three consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the principal office of the district is located and by posting the same in the office of the district at least thirty days prior to the date fixed in the notice for the hearing on the petition. Any owner of property in the district or person interested in the contract or proposed contract may appear and demur to or answer the petition at any time prior to the date fixed for the hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court, and the petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail to appear. The petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction. Upon hearing, the court shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted, make such findings with reference thereto, and render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants. Costs may be divided or apportioned among the contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment and decree of the court may be had as in other similar cases but shall be commenced within thirty days after the entry of the judgment, decree, or final order complained of. The code of civil procedure shall govern in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise specified in this section. The court shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 34, p. 556;

Laws 1961, c. 227, § 3, p. 672;

Laws 1987, LB 33, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 43, § 23.

A determination of the feasibility of a water reclamation project and the determination of the adequacy of a supply of water for the project are legislative functions and not within the scope of judicial review authorized by this section. Twin Loups Reclamation & Irr. District v. Blessing, 202 Neb. 513, 276 N.W.2d 185 (1979).

This and two succeeding sections do not amend or repeal any provision of the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, but are simply part of a general act complete within itself which authorize a special confirmatory proceeding. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).